California statutes. Vehicle Code
(History: Added by renumbering Section 390 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 14.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

353.

“Hazardous material” is any substance, material, or device posing an unreasonable risk to health, safety, or property during transportation, as defined by regulations adopted pursuant to Section 2402.7. “Hazardous material” includes explosives and hazardous wastes or substances as defined by regulations adopted pursuant to Section 25141 of the Health and Safety Code and medical wastes, as defined in Section 117690 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 422.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

360.

“Highway” is a way or place of whatever nature, publicly maintained and open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel. Highway includes street.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

362.

A “house car” is a motor vehicle originally designed, or permanently altered, and equipped for human habitation, or to which a camper has been permanently attached. A motor vehicle to which a camper has been temporarily attached is not a house car except that, for the purposes of Division 11 (commencing with Section 21000) and Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000), a motor vehicle equipped with a camper having an axle that is designed to support a portion of the weight of the camper unit shall be considered a three-axle house car regardless of the method of attachment or manner of registration. A house car shall not be deemed to be a motortruck.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------

365.

An “intersection” is the area embraced within the prolongation of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways, of two highways which join one another at approximately right angles or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come in conflict.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

370.

A “legal owner” is a person holding a security interest in a vehicle which is subject to the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, or the lessor of a vehicle to the State or to any county, city, district, or political subdivision of the State, or to the United States, under a lease, lease-sale, or rental-purchase agreement which grants possession of the vehicle to the lessee for a period of 30 consecutive days or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1867.)
-------------------------------------------

371.

Lessee includes “bailee” and is a person who leases, offers to lease, or is offered the lease of a motor vehicle for a term exceeding four months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

372.

A “lessor” is a person who, for a term exceeding four months, leases or offers for lease, negotiates or attempts to negotiate a lease, or induce any person to lease a motor vehicle; and who receives or expects to receive a commission, money, brokerage fees, profit or any other thing of value from the lessee of said vehicle. “Lessor” includes “bailor” and “lease” includes “bailment.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

373.

A “lessor-retailer” is a lessor or renter who, except under the circumstances described in subdivision (a) of Section 286, makes a retail sale or sales of a previously leased or rented vehicle or vehicles to other than any of the following:

(a) The lessee of the vehicle, or the person who, for a period of at least one year, has been designated by the lessee as the driver of the vehicle covered by a written lease agreement.

(b) A buyer for agricultural, business, or commercial purposes.

(c) A government or governmental agency or instrumentality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 561.)
-------------------------------------------

375.

“Lighting equipment” is any of the following lamps or devices:

(a) A headlamp, auxiliary driving, passing, or fog lamp, fog taillamp, taillamp, stoplamp, supplemental stoplamp, license plate lamp, clearance lamp, side marker lamp, signal lamp or device, supplemental signal lamp, deceleration signal device, cornering lamp, running lamp, red, blue, amber, or white warning lamp, flashing red schoolbus lamp, side-mounted turn signal lamp, and schoolbus side lamp.

(b) An operating unit or canceling mechanism for turn signal lamps or for the simultaneous flashing of turn signal lamps as vehicular hazard signals, and an advance stoplamp switch.

(c) A flasher mechanism for turn signals, red schoolbus lamps, warning lamps, the simultaneous flashing of turn signal lamps as vehicular hazard signals, and the headlamp flashing systems for emergency vehicles.

(d) Any equipment regulating the light emitted from a lamp or device or the light sources therein.

(e) A reflector, including reflectors for use on bicycles, and reflectors used for required warning devices.

(f) An illuminating device that emits radiation predominantly in the infrared or ultraviolet regions of the spectrum, whether or not these emissions are visible to the unaided eye.

(g) An illuminated sign installed on a bus that utilizes an electronic display to convey the route
 designation, route number, run number, public service announcement, or any combination of this information, or an illuminated sign utilized pursuant to Section 25353.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 529, Sec. 2.   (AB 607)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

377.

A “limit line” is a solid white line not less than 12 nor more than 24 inches wide, extending across a roadway or any portion thereof to indicate the point at which traffic is required to stop in compliance with legal requirements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

378.

(a) “Limousine” means any sedan or sport utility vehicle, of either standard or extended length, with a seating capacity of not more than 10 passengers including the driver, used in the transportation of passengers for hire on a prearranged basis within this state.

(b) “Modified limousine” means any vehicle that has been modified, altered, or extended in a manner that increases the overall wheelbase of the vehicle, exceeding the original equipment manufacturer’s published wheelbase dimension for the base model and year of the vehicle, in any amount sufficient to accommodate additional passengers with a seating capacity of not more than 10 passengers including the
 driver, and is used in the transportation of passengers for hire. For purposes of this subdivision, “wheelbase” means the longitudinal distance between the vertical centerlines of the front and rear wheels.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 860, Sec. 10.   (SB 611)   Effective September 30, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

380.

“Liquefied petroleum gas” means normal butane, isobutane, propane, or butylene (including isomers) or mixtures composed predominantly thereof in liquid or gaseous state having a vapor pressure in excess of 40 pounds per square inch absolute at a temperature of 100 degrees Fahrenheit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

385.

“Local authorities” means the legislative body of every county or municipality having authority to adopt local police regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

385.2.

A “logging dolly” is a vehicle designed for carrying logs, having one or more axles that, if there are more than one, are not more than 54 inches apart, and used in connection with a motor truck solely for the purpose of transporting logs and securely connected with the towing vehicle both by a reach and by the load.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 20.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

385.3.

A “logging vehicle” is a vehicle used exclusively in the conduct of logging operations and not designed for the transportation of persons or property on a highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 21.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

385.5.

(a) A “low-speed vehicle” is a motor vehicle that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Has four wheels.

(2) Can attain a speed, in one mile, of more than 20 miles per hour and not more than 25 miles per hour, on a paved level surface.

(3) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 3,000 pounds.

(b) (1) For the purposes of this section, a “low-speed vehicle” is not a golf cart, except when operated pursuant to Section 21115 or 21115.1.

(2) A “low-speed vehicle” is also known as a “neighborhood electric vehicle.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 66, Sec. 1.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

386.

A “managerial employee” is a person who exercises control over a business licensed under this code, whether compensated by salary or commission, including, but not limited to, any person who is employed as a general manager, business manager, assistant general manager, finance and insurance manager, advertising manager, or sales manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 791, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

387.

“Manufactured home” is a manufactured home, as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, a commercial coach, as defined in Section 18001. 8 of the Health and Safety Code, a mobilehome, as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code, factory-built housing, as defined in Section 18971 of the Health and Safety Code, and a trailer coach which is in excess of 102 inches in width, or in excess of 40 feet in overall length measured from the foremost point of the trailer hitch to the rear extremity of the trailer. Manufactured home does not include a recreational vehicle, as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1185, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

389.

A “manufacturer branch” is an office maintained by a manufacturer for the sale of new vehicles to dealers or for directing or supervising in whole or in part the manufacturer’s representatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 797.)
-------------------------------------------

395.

A “metal tire” is a tire the surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard nonresilient material.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

395.5.

A “mobile billboard advertising display” means an advertising display that is attached to a mobile, nonmotorized vehicle, device, or bicycle, that carries, pulls, or transports a sign or billboard, and is for the primary purpose of advertising.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 538, Sec. 1.   (AB 1298)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

396.

“Mobilehome” is a structure as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code. For the purposes of enforcement of highway safety laws and regulations, a mobilehome is a trailer coach which is in excess of 102 inches in width, or in excess of 40 feet in overall length measured from the foremost point of the trailer hitch to the rear extremity of the trailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1185, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

400.

(a) A “motorcycle” is a motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider, designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground.

(b) A motor vehicle that has four wheels in contact with the ground, two of which are a functional part of a sidecar, is a motorcycle if the vehicle otherwise comes within the definition of subdivision (a).

(c) A farm tractor is not a motorcycle.

(d) A three-wheeled motor vehicle that otherwise meets the requirements of subdivision (a), has a partially or completely enclosed seating area for the driver and passenger, is used by local public agencies for the enforcement of parking control provisions, and is operated at slow speeds on public streets, is not a motorcycle. However, a motor vehicle described in this subdivision shall comply with the applicable sections of this code imposing equipment installation requirements on motorcycles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

A “motor-driven cycle” is any motorcycle with a motor that displaces less than 150 cubic centimeters. A motor-driven cycle does not include a motorized bicycle, as defined in Section 406.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 342, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

406.

(a) A “motorized bicycle” or “moped” is a two-wheeled or three-wheeled device having fully operative pedals for propulsion by human power, or having no pedals if powered solely by electrical energy, and an automatic transmission and a motor that produces less than 4 gross brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the device at a maximum speed of not more than 30 miles per hour on level ground.

(b) Every manufacturer of a motorized bicycle or moped, as defined in this section, shall provide a disclosure to buyers that advises buyers that their existing insurance policies may not provide coverage for these bicycles and that they should contact their insurance company or insurance agent to determine if coverage is provided.
 The disclosure shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) The disclosure shall be printed in not less than 14-point boldface type on a single sheet of paper that contains no information other than the disclosure.

(2) The disclosure shall include the following language in capital letters:
“YOUR INSURANCE POLICIES MAY NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR ACCIDENTS INVOLVING THE USE OF THIS BICYCLE. TO DETERMINE IF COVERAGE IS PROVIDED YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY OR AGENT.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

407.

A “motorized quadricycle” is a four-wheeled device, and a “motorized tricycle” is a three-wheeled device, designed to carry not more than two persons, including the driver, and having either an electric motor or a motor with an automatic transmission developing less than two gross brake horsepower and capable of propelling the device at a maximum speed of not more than 30 miles per hour on level ground. The device shall be utilized only by a person who by reason of physical disability is otherwise unable to move about as a pedestrian or by a senior citizen as defined in Section 13000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1292, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

407.5.

(a) A “motorized scooter” is any two-wheeled device that has handlebars, has either a floorboard that is designed to be stood upon when riding or a seat and footrests in place of the floorboard, and is powered by an electric motor. This device may also be designed to be powered by human propulsion.
 For purposes of this section, a motorcycle, as defined in Section 400, a motor-driven cycle, as defined in Section 405, or a motorized bicycle or moped, as defined in Section 406, is not a motorized scooter.

(b) A device meeting the definition in subdivision (a) that is powered by a source other than electrical power is also a motorized scooter.

(c) (1) A manufacturer of motorized scooters shall provide a disclosure to buyers that advises buyers that the buyers’ existing insurance policies may not provide coverage for these scooters and that the buyers should contact their insurance company or insurance agent to determine if coverage is provided.

(2) The disclosure required under paragraph (1) shall meet both of the following requirements:

(A) The disclosure shall be printed in not less than 14-point boldface type on a single sheet of paper that contains no information other than the disclosure.

(B) The disclosure shall include the following language in capital letters:
“YOUR INSURANCE POLICIES MAY NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR ACCIDENTS INVOLVING THE USE OF THIS SCOOTER. TO DETERMINE IF COVERAGE IS PROVIDED, YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY OR AGENT.”

(d) (1) A manufacturer of motorized scooters shall provide a disclosure to a buyer that advises the buyer that the buyer may not modify or alter the exhaust system to cause that system to amplify or create an excessive noise, or to fail to meet applicable emission requirements.

(2) The
 disclosure required under paragraph (1) shall meet both of the following requirements:

(A) The disclosure shall be printed in not less than 14-point boldface type on a single sheet of paper that contains no information other than the disclosure.

(B) The disclosure shall include the following language in capital letters:

“YOU MAY NOT MODIFY OR ALTER THE EXHAUST SYSTEM OF THIS SCOOTER TO CAUSE IT TO AMPLIFY OR CREATE EXCESSIVE NOISE PER VEHICLE CODE SECTION 21226, OR TO FAIL TO MEET APPLICABLE EMISSION REQUIREMENTS PER VEHICLE CODE 27156.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 311, Sec. 2.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

408.

“Motor carrier” is the registered owner, lessee, licensee, or bailee of any vehicle set forth in Section 34500, who operates or directs the operation of any such vehicle on either a for-hire or not-for-hire basis. “Motor carrier” also includes a motor carrier’s agents, officers, and representatives, as well as employees responsible for the hiring, supervising, training, assigning, or dispatching of drivers and employees concerned with the installation, inspection, and maintenance of motor vehicle equipment or accessories.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 208, Sec. 7.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

410.

A “motor truck” or “motortruck” is a motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 272, Sec. 11.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

415.

(a) A “motor vehicle” is a vehicle that is self-propelled.

(b) “Motor vehicle” does not include a self-propelled wheelchair, motorized tricycle, or motorized quadricycle, if operated by a person who, by reason of physical disability, is otherwise unable to move about as a pedestrian.

(c) For purposes of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 2, “motor vehicle” includes a recreational vehicle as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, but does not include a truck camper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 404, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

425.

A “muffler” is a device consisting of a series of chambers or baffle plates, or other mechanical design, for the purpose of receiving exhaust gas from an internal combustion engine, and effective in reducing noise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

426.

“New motor vehicle dealer” is a dealer, as defined in Section 285, who, in addition to the requirements of that section, either acquires for resale new and unregistered motor vehicles from manufacturers or distributors of those motor vehicles or acquires for resale new off-highway motorcycles, or all-terrain vehicles from manufacturers or distributors of the vehicles. A distinction shall not be made, nor any different construction be given to the definition of “new motor vehicle dealer” and “dealer” except for the application of the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 2 and Sections 4456, 4750.6, and 11704.5. Sections 3001 and 3003 do not, however, apply to a dealer who deals exclusively in motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles, or recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 8, Sec. 20.   (AB 85)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

430.

A “new vehicle” is a vehicle constructed entirely from new parts that has never been the subject of a retail sale, or registered with the department, or registered with the appropriate agency or authority of any other state, District of Columbia, territory or possession of the United States, or foreign state, province, or country.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1253, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

431.

A “nonrepairable vehicle” is a vehicle of a type otherwise subject to registration that meets the criteria specified in subdivision (a), (b), or (c). The vehicle shall be issued a nonrepairable vehicle certificate and the vehicle, the vehicle frame, or unitized frame and body, as applicable, and as defined in Section 670.5, shall not be titled or registered.

(a) A nonrepairable vehicle is a vehicle that has no resale value except as a source of parts or scrap metal, and which the owner irreversibly designates solely as a source of parts or scrap metal.

(b) A nonrepairable vehicle is a completely stripped vehicle (a surgical strip) recovered from theft, missing all of the bolt on sheet metal body panels, all of the doors and hatches, substantially all of the interior components, and substantially all of the grill and light assemblies, or that the owner designates has little or no resale value other than its worth as a source of scrap metal, or as a source of a vehicle identification number that could be used illegally.

(c) A nonrepairable vehicle is a completely burned vehicle (burned hulk) that has been burned to the extent that there are no more usable or repairable body or interior components, tires and wheels, or drive train components, and which the owner irreversibly designates as having little or no resale value other than its worth as scrap metal or as a source of a vehicle identification number that could be used illegally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

432.

A “nonrepairable vehicle certificate” is a vehicle ownership document issued to the owner of a nonrepairable vehicle. Ownership of the vehicle may only be transferred two times on a nonrepairable vehicle certificate. A vehicle for which a nonrepairable vehicle certificate has been issued may not be titled or registered for use on the roads or highways of California. A nonrepairable vehicle certificate shall be conspicuously labeled with the word “nonrepairable” across the front.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

435.

“Nonresident” is a person who is not a resident of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

435.5.

“Nonresident daily commuter” means a person who is not a resident of this state, but who enters and leaves this state on a daily basis for the purpose of employment and whose vehicle is principally garaged out of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1090, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

436.

An “off-highway motorcycle” means a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle which is subject to identification under this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1584, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

436.1.

An “off-highway electric motorcycle,” commonly referred to as an eMoto, is an off-highway motorcycle subject to identification under this code that meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Is designed by the manufacturer for operation primarily off the highway.

(b) Is powered by an electric motor for which a motor number is not required.

(c) Has handlebars for steering control.

(d) Has a straddle seat provided by the manufacturer.

(e) Has two wheels.

(f) Is not equipped with pedals from the manufacturer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 588, Sec. 1.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

440.

An “official traffic control device” is any sign, signal, marking, or device, consistent with Section 21400, placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic, but does not include islands, curbs, traffic barriers, speed humps, speed bumps, or other roadway design features.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 51.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

445.

An “official traffic control signal” is any device, whether manually, electrically or mechanically operated, by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and proceed and which is erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

450.

An “oil well production service unit” is any vehicle specifically designed for and used exclusively in servicing oil wells which is only incidentally operated or moved on a highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 133.)
-------------------------------------------

455.

“Original driver’s license” means the first driver’s license issued a person under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

460.

An “owner” is a person having all the incidents of ownership, including the legal title of a vehicle whether or not such person lends, rents, or creates a security interest in the vehicle; the person entitled to the possession of a vehicle as the purchaser under a security agreement; or the State, or any county, city, district, or political subdivision of the State, or the United States, when entitled to the possession and use of a vehicle under a lease, lease-sale, or rental-purchase agreement for a period of 30 consecutive days or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1867.)
-------------------------------------------

461.

The Senate, Assembly, or any committees thereof, or the Governor’s office in possession and using vehicles under a lease, lease-sale, or rental-purchase agreement for a period of 30 consecutive days or more, unless otherwise provided in the lease or rental agreement, shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 460, upon the giving of written notice to the department of the desire to be so exempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

462.

A “paratransit vehicle” is a passenger vehicle, other than a bus, schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, youth bus, general public paratransit vehicle, or taxicab that is both of the following:

(a) (1) Operated for hire by a business, nonprofit organization, or the state, or a political subdivision of the state utilizing drivers who receive compensation for their services and who spend a majority of their workweek operating a passenger vehicle.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, compensation does not include reimbursement to volunteer drivers of the cost of providing transportation services at a rate not greater than that approved by the United States Internal Revenue Service for volunteers.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “for hire” means that the entity providing transportation services is compensated for the transportation under contract or agreement.

(b) Regularly used to provide transportation services to any of the following:

(1) Disabled persons who meet the definition of handicapped persons, as defined in Section 99206.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) Persons with a developmental disability, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) Individuals with disabilities who are determined to be eligible for complementary paratransit services under Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (P.L.101-336).

(4) Persons who are 55 years of age or older.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 404, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

463.

“Park or parking” shall mean the standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading merchandise or passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1608.)
-------------------------------------------

464.

A “passenger transportation vehicle” is any vehicle, including a trailer bus, designed, used, or maintained for carrying more than 10 persons including the driver, which requires the person to have in his or her immediate possession a valid driver’s license for the appropriate class of vehicle to be driven endorsed for passenger transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1360, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

465.

A “passenger vehicle” is any motor vehicle, other than a motortruck, truck tractor, or a bus, as defined in Section 233, and used or maintained for the transportation of persons. The term “passenger vehicle” shall include a housecar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1008, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

467.

(a) A “pedestrian” is a person who is afoot or who is using any of the following:

(1) A means of conveyance propelled by human power other than a bicycle.

(2) An electric personal assistive mobility device.

(b) “Pedestrian” includes a person who is operating a self-propelled wheelchair, motorized tricycle, or motorized quadricycle and, by reason of physical disability, is otherwise unable to move about as a pedestrian, as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 404, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2007, Ch. 106, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

467.5.

“Pedicab” means any of the following:

(a) A bicycle, including an electric bicycle, that has three or more wheels, that transports, or is capable of transporting, passengers on seats attached to the bicycle, that is operated by a person, and that is being used for transporting passengers for hire.

(b) A bicycle, including an electric bicycle, that pulls a trailer, sidecar, or similar device, that transports, or is capable of transporting, passengers on seats attached to the trailer, sidecar, or similar device, that is operated by a person, and that is being used for transporting passengers for hire.

(c) A four-wheeled device that is primarily or exclusively pedal-powered, has a seating capacity for eight or more passengers, cannot travel in excess of 15 miles per hour, and is being used for transporting passengers for hire. A pedicab defined under this subdivision is subject to the requirements of Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 21215) of Chapter 1 of Division 11.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 311, Sec. 3.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

468.

The department shall commence the “permanent trailer identification plate program,” on or after December 31, 2001, and may designate the method, consistent with this code, to be used by trailers, as defined in Section 5014.1, to receive an assigned permanent trailer identification plate for all trailers, except for trailer coaches and park trailers as described in subdivision (b) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, for identification purposes. An auxiliary dolly or tow dolly may be assigned a permanent trailer identification plate. The plate shall be in a size and design as determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 15.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

470.

“Person” includes a natural person, firm, copartnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 225.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

471.

A “pickup truck” is a motor truck with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of less than 11,500 pounds, an unladen weight of less than 8,001 pounds, and which is equipped with an open box-type bed not exceeding 9 feet in length. “Pickup truck” does not include a motor vehicle otherwise meeting the above definition, that is equipped with a bed-mounted storage compartment unit commonly called a “utility body.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 652, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

472.

A “pilot car” is a motor vehicle, except a motorcycle, motorized bicycle, or motorized quadricycle, which is used to escort one or more other vehicles, when required, due to the vehicles’ size or character of load, in accordance with conditions set forth in a permit issued by the appropriate state agency or by a local authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 568, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

473.

(a) A “pocket bike” is a two-wheeled motorized device that has a seat or saddle for the use of the rider, and that is not designed or manufactured for highway use. “Pocket bike” does not include an off-highway motorcycle, as defined in Section 436.

(b) For purposes of this section, a vehicle is designed for highway use if it meets the applicable Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards, as contained in Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and is equipped in accordance with the requirements of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 323, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

475.

A “pole or pipe dolly” is a vehicle, other than a motor vehicle, having one or more axles which axles, if there be more than one, are not more than 54 inches apart, and two or more wheels, used in connection with a motor vehicle solely for the purpose of transporting poles, timbers, pipes, or integral structural materials and connected with the towing vehicle both by chain, rope, cable, or drawbar, and by the load, without any part of the weight of the dolly resting upon the towing vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

480.

A “power brake” is any breaking gear or mechanism that aids in applying the brakes of a vehicle and which utilizes vacuum, compressed air, electricity, or hydraulic pressure developed by the motive power of that vehicle for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

485.

A “pneumatic tire” is a tire inflated or capable of inflation with compressed air.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

490.

“Private road or driveway” is a way or place in private ownership and used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner but not by other members of the public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

492.

A “private school” is any school, whether conducted for profit or not, giving a course of training similar to that given in a public school at or below the twelfth grade, including but not limited to schools owned or operated by any church.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 406.)
-------------------------------------------

500.

“Recreational off-highway vehicle” means a motor vehicle meeting all of the following criteria:

(a) Designed by the manufacturer for operation primarily off of the highway.

(b) Has a steering wheel for steering control.

(c) Has nonstraddle seating provided by the manufacturer for the operator and all passengers.

(d) (1) Has a maximum speed capability of greater than 30 miles per hour.

(2) A vehicle designed by the manufacturer with
 a maximum speed capability of 30 miles per hour or less but is modified so that it has a maximum speed capability of greater than 30 miles per hour satisfies the criteria set forth in this subdivision.

(e) Has an engine displacement equal to or less than 1,000cc (61 ci).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

505.

A “registered owner” is a person registered by the department as the owner of a vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

505.2.

(a) A “registration service” is a person engaged in the business of soliciting or receiving an application for the registration, renewal of registration, or transfer of registration or ownership, of a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code, or of soliciting or receiving an application for a motor carrier permit under Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600), or of transmitting or presenting those documents to the department, when any compensation is solicited or received for the service. “Registration service” includes, but is not limited to, a person who, for compensation, processes registration documents, conducts lien sales, or processes vehicle dismantling documents.

(b) “Registration service” does not include the following:

(1) A person performing registration services on a vehicle acquired by that person for his or her own personal use or for use in the regular course of that person’s business.

(2) A person who solicits applications for or sells, for compensation, nonresident permits for the operation of vehicles within this state.

(3) An employee of one or more dealers or dismantlers, or a combination thereof, who performs either of the following:

 (A) Registration services for vehicles acquired by, consigned to, or sold by one or more of the employing dealers or dismantlers.

(B) Vehicle transactions on behalf of one or more of the employing dealers or dismantlers, if the transaction is for an employing dealer or dismantler who is a qualified business partner in compliance with the Business Partner Automation Program established by the department pursuant to Section 1685.

(4) A motor club, as defined in Section 12142 of the Insurance Code.

(5) A common carrier acting in the regular course of its business in transmitting applications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 419, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

506.

“Registration year” is the period of time beginning with the date the vehicle is first required to be registered in this state and ending on the date designated by the director for expiration of the registration or the period of time designated for subsequent renewal thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------

507.

The “relevant market area” is any area within a radius of 10 miles from the site of a potential new dealership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

507.5.
